District of Columbia statutes.
3-3609

Repealed

Denial, revocation, suspension, cancellation, and withdrawal of license.

Repealed.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 626, Pub. L. 88-503, § 10
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 5(b), 45 DCR 745
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
1981 Ed., § 2-2609.
1973 Ed., § 2-2409.